Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6290.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "office of primary care transformation act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (b) "Office" means the office of primary care transformation created in section 5. (c) "Primary care" means family practice, internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics, psychiatry, and emergency medicine. (d) "Primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission" means the primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission created in the primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission act. Sec. 5. (1) The office of primary care transformation is created in the department. (2) The office shall do all of the following: (a) Provide technical assistance and help to primary care practices so that the primary care practices are able to provide patient-centered, team-based, accessible, and coordinated care. (b) Analyze and administer policies that improve access to high-quality and affordable primary care. (c) Expand and support the primary care workforce. (d) Address social needs. (e) Grow provider capacity for patient-centered, whole-person care in this state. (f) Assist and strengthen partnerships with community care hubs and other community organizations that assist patients with social support needs and with overcoming barriers to receiving primary care. (g) Collaborate with Michigan Health Information Network Shared Services to consider ways to invest resources that are needed to allow for community information exchanges to be connected to claims processing and electronic medical records systems. (h) Assist primary care practices and providers with communications, education, developing and disseminating materials, quality improvement, and evaluations. (i) Identify funding sources to support the office. (j) Collaborate with the primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission in efforts to improve access to and lower the costs of primary care for individuals in this state. (k) Manage a center of excellence focusing on primary care and health systems. (l) Make recommendations to the legislature on ways to invest in all payer claims database systems, health information exchanges, and community information exchanges, to strengthen state-based interoperability. (m) Analyze and make recommendations to the legislature on ways to leverage federal Medicaid matching funds, state revenue, fees, or other funding sources to support all payer claims database systems. (n) Make recommendations to the legislature on grant programs or pilot programs that support primary care. (o) Exercise any other power granted to the office by law. Sec. 7. (1) The primary care transformation fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department shall expend money from the fund on appropriation to implement this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06331'26) or House Bill No. 6289 (request no. H06331'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.